Utah statutes.
35A-3-306.   Limits on eligibility.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "battered or subjected to extreme cruelty"
is defined in Section 103(a)(1) of P.L. 104-193 or 42 U.S.C. Sec.
608(a)(7)(C)(iii), The Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity
Reconciliation Act of 1996.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the division may not provide cash
assistance to a family who has received cash assistance for 36 months or more.
(3) (a)  The division shall count toward the 36-month time limit in Subsection
(2) any time after January 1, 1997, during which:
(i)  the parent client received cash assistance in this or another state; and
(ii) the parent client is disqualified from receiving cash assistance and the
parent client's income and assets are counted in determining eligibility for
the family in this or another state.
(b) (i)  The division may not count toward the 36-month time limit in
Subsection (2) or the 24-month time period in Subsection (4) any time during
which:
(A)  a person 18 years of age or older received cash assistance as a minor
child and not as a parent; or
(B)  a parent client received transitional support cash assistance.
(ii)  Transitional support cash assistance:
(A)  may be paid if the department determines the assistance is necessary to
stabilize employment and prevent recidivism;
(B)  is only available to a parent client who was previously receiving cash
assistance under the Family Employment Program but who becomes ineligible due
to earned or unearned income; and
(C)  may be granted for a maximum of three months provided the parent client
is employed an average of 30 hours per week during the transitional period.
(4) (a)  For up to 24 months, the division may provide cash assistance to a
family beyond the 36-month time limit in Subsection (2) if during the previous
two months, the parent client was employed for no less than 20 hours per week.
(b)  For up to 20% of the average monthly number of families who receive cash
assistance under this part, the division may provide cash assistance to a
family beyond the 36-month time limit in Subsection (2):
(i)  by reason of a hardship; or
(ii)  if the family includes an individual who has been battered or subjected
to extreme cruelty.
(c)  For up to 20% of the average monthly number of families who receive cash
assistance under this part, the division may provide cash assistance to a
family beyond the additional 24-month time period in Subsection (4)(a):
(i)  by reason of a hardship; or
(ii)  if the family includes an individual who has been battered or subjected
to extreme cruelty.
(d)  Except as provided in Subsections (4)(b) and (c), the division may not
provide cash assistance to a family who has received 60 months of cash
assistance after October 1, 1996.
